Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6256.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10. (1) A fund to be known as the Michigan transportation fund is established in the state treasury as a separate fund. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the legislature shall appropriate money for the necessary expenses incurred in the administration and enforcement of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1001 to 207.1170, the motor carrier act, 1933 PA 254, MCL 475.1 to 479.42, and sections 801 to 810 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.801 to 257.810. Money appropriated for necessary expenses must be based upon established cost allocation methodology that reflects actual costs. Appropriations for the necessary expenses incurred by the department of state in administration and enforcement of sections 801 to 810 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.801 to 257.810, must be made from the Michigan transportation fund and from money in the transportation administration collection fund created in section 810b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.810b. Appropriations from the Michigan transportation fund for the necessary expenses incurred by the department of state in administration and enforcement of sections 801 to 810 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.801 to 257.810, must not exceed $20,000,000.00 per state fiscal year. Except as provided in section 51d of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.51d, all All money in the Michigan transportation fund is apportioned and appropriated in the following manner: (a) Not more than $3,000,000.00 as may be annually appropriated each fiscal year to the state trunk line fund for subsequent deposit in the rail grade crossing account. (b) Not more than $3,000,000.00 as may be annually appropriated each fiscal year to the state trunk line fund for subsequent deposit in the grade crossing surface account. (c) Not more than $3,000,000.00 each year to the local bridge fund established in subsection (4) for the purpose of payment of the principal, interest, and redemption premium on any notes or bonds issued by the state transportation commission under former section 11b or subsection (9). (d) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision and subject to section 11h, $2,000,000.00 each year of the revenue from 3 cents of the tax levied under section 8(1)(a) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, to the local agency wetland mitigation board fund created in section 11h. (e) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, $5,000,000.00 each year of the revenue from 3 cents of the tax levied under section 8(1)(a) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, to the movable bridge fund created in section 11g, with the remainder to the state trunk line fund, county road commissions, and cities and villages in the percentages provided in subdivision (l). The department shall annually adjust the amount allocated under this subdivision by an amount equal to the annual increase in the Detroit Consumer Price Index for the preceding year. (f) One-half of the revenue from 1 cent of the tax levied under section 8(1)(a) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, to the state trunk line fund for the repair of state bridges under section 11, and 1/2 of the revenue from 1 cent of the tax levied under section 8(1)(a) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, to the local bridge fund created in subsection (4) for distribution only to cities, villages, and county road commissions. (g) $50,000,000.00 to the state trunk line fund for debt service costs on state of Michigan projects. (h) Ten percent to the comprehensive transportation fund for the purposes described in section 10e. (i) $5,000,000.00 to the local bridge fund established in subsection (4) for distribution only to the local bridge advisory board, the regional bridge councils, cities, villages, and county road commissions. (j) $36,775,000.00 to the state trunk line fund for subsequent deposit in the transportation economic development fund created in section 2 of 1987 PA 231, MCL 247.902, with first priority for allocation to debt service on bonds issued to fund transportation economic development fund projects. In addition, $3,500,000.00 is appropriated from the Michigan transportation fund to the state trunk line fund for subsequent deposit in the transportation economic development fund created in section 2 of 1987 PA 231, MCL 247.902, to be used for economic development road projects in any of the targeted industries described in section 9(1)(a) of 1987 PA 231, MCL 247.909. (k) Not less than $33,000,000.00 as may be annually appropriated each fiscal year to the local program fund created in section 11e. (l) The balance of the Michigan transportation fund, as well as funds allocated to the Michigan transportation fund and collected under the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967, as follows, after deduction of the amounts appropriated in subdivisions (a) to (k): (i) 39.1% to the state trunk line fund for the purposes described in section 11 and section 10o(5). (ii) 39.1% as follows: (A) Subject to section 11k, $3,000,000.00 to the local agency disaster relief board fund created in section 11k. (B) The remainder to the county road commissions of this state. (iii) 21.8% as follows: (A) Subject to section 11k, $2,000,000.00 to the local agency disaster relief board fund created in section 11k. (B) The remainder to the cities and villages of this state. (2) The money appropriated under this section must be used for the purposes as provided in this act and any other applicable act. Subject to section 9b, the department shall develop programs in conjunction with the Michigan Chamber of Commerce and the Michigan Minority Supplier Development Council to assist small businesses, including those located in enterprise zones and those located in empowerment zones as determined under federal law, as defined by law in becoming qualified to bid. (3) From federal funds, an amount equal to 31-1/2% of the money formerly appropriated to this state from the federal government under former 23 USC 157, commonly known as minimum guarantee funds, must be allocated to the transportation economic development fund, if the allocation is consistent with federal law. This money must be distributed 16-1/2% for development projects for rural counties as defined by law and 15% for capacity improvement or advanced traffic management systems in urban counties as defined by law. Federal money allocated for distribution under this section is eligible for obligation and use by all recipients as provided in the moving ahead for progress in the 21st century act, Public Law 112-141. (4) A fund to be known as the local bridge fund is established in the state treasury as a separate fund. The money appropriated to the local bridge fund and the interest accruing to that fund must be expended for the local bridge program. The purpose of the fund is to provide financial assistance to highway authorities for the preservation, improvement, or reconstruction of existing bridges or for the construction of bridges to replace existing bridges in whole or part. The money in the local bridge fund is not subject to section 12(15) or 13(5). The local bridge advisory board is created and must consist of 6 voting members appointed by the state transportation commission and 2 nonvoting members appointed by the department. The board must include 3 members from the County Road Association of Michigan, 1 member who represents counties with populations 65,000 or greater, 1 member who represents counties with populations greater than 30,000 and less than 65,000, and 1 member who represents counties with populations of 30,000 or less. Three members must be appointed from the Michigan Municipal League, 1 member who represents cities with a population 75,000 or greater, 1 member who represents cities with a population less than 75,000, and 1 member who represents villages. Each organization with voting rights shall submit a list of nominees in each population category to the state transportation commission. The state transportation commission shall make the appointments from the lists submitted under this subsection. Voting members must be appointed for 2 years. The chairperson of the board must be selected from among the voting members of the board. In addition to the 2 nonvoting members, the department shall provide qualified administrative staff and qualified technical assistance to the board. (5) No less than 5% and no more than 15% of the money received in the local bridge fund may be used for critical repair of large bridges and emergencies as determined by the local bridge advisory board. Money remaining after the money allocated for critical large bridge repair and emergencies is deducted must be distributed by the board to the regional bridge councils created under this section. One regional council must be formed for each department of transportation region as those regions exist on October 1, 2004. The regional councils must consist of 2 members of the County Road Association of Michigan from counties in the region, 2 members of the Michigan Municipal League from cities and villages in the region, and 1 member of the department in each region. The members of the department are nonvoting members and shall provide qualified administrative staff and qualified technical assistance to the regional councils. (6) Money in the local bridge fund after deduction of the amounts set aside for critical repair of large bridges and emergency repairs must be distributed among the regional bridge councils according to all of the following ratios, which must be assigned a weight expressed as a percentage as determined by the board, with each ratio receiving no greater than a 50% weight and no less than a 25% weight: (a) A ratio with a numerator that is the total number of local bridges in the region and a denominator that is the total number of local bridges in this state. (b) A ratio with a numerator that is the total local bridge deck area in the region and a denominator that is the total local bridge deck area in this state. (c) A ratio with a numerator that is the total amount of structurally deficient local bridge deck area in the region and a denominator that is the total amount of structurally deficient local bridge deck area in this state. (7) The regional bridge councils shall allocate the money received from the board for the preservation, improvement, and reconstruction of existing bridges or for the construction of bridges to replace existing bridges in whole or in part in each region. (8) Each January, the department shall submit a report to the chair and the minority vice-chair of the appropriations committees of the senate and the house of representatives, and to the standing committees on transportation of the senate and the house of representatives, on all of the following activities for the previous state fiscal year: (a) A listing of how much money was dedicated for emergency and large bridge repair. (b) A listing of what emergency and large bridge repair projects were funded. (c) The actual weights used in the calculation required under subsection (6). (d) A listing of the total money distributed to each region. (e) A listing of the specific projects that were funded under subsection (7). (9) The state transportation commission shall borrow money and issue notes or bonds in an amount of not less than $30,000,000.00 to supplement the funding provided for the local bridge program under subsection (5). The bonds or notes issued under this subsection may be issued by the commission for any purpose for which other local bridge money may be used under this section. The bonds or notes authorized by this subsection must be issued by resolution of the state transportation commission consistent with the requirements of section 18b. (10) The department shall promulgate rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, governing the administration of the local bridge program. The rules must set forth the eligibility criteria for financial assistance under the program and other matters related to the program that the department considers necessary and desirable. The department shall take into consideration the availability of federal aid and other financial resources of the highway authority responsible for the bridge, the importance of the bridge to the highway, road, or street network, and the condition of the existing bridge. (11) The revenue appropriated to the local bridge fund under subsection (1)(i) must be distributed only to the local bridge advisory board, the regional bridge councils, cities, villages, and county road commissions. (12) The regional bridge councils shall determine what bridge projects are selected for funding from the local bridge fund created in subsection (4) and shall make a list of selected projects available to interested parties in the region. A determination that a bridge project is selected for funding in a given fiscal year is not approval to disburse the money. (13) A county road commission, city, or village may implement a bridge project if the bridge project has been selected for funding and is included in the appropriate regional bridge council's current multiyear bridge plan for the local bridge program but the regional bridge council has not allocated money to the bridge project for the fiscal year that the bridge project is on the current multiyear bridge plan. A county road commission, city, or village may borrow money to implement a project that has been selected for funding and is included in the appropriate regional bridge council's current multiyear bridge plan but has not been allocated money by the regional bridge council. Based on available local bridge money, when a bridge project that was implemented with borrowed money is allocated funding in a subsequent fiscal year, the funding must only be used to repay the amount approved by the multiyear bridge plan when the money was borrowed. To be eligible for repayment of the amount borrowed, a bridge project that has been implemented with borrowed money must be administered through the department's local bridge program. Sec. 11. (1) A fund to be known as the state trunk line fund is established in the state treasury as a separate fund. The money deposited in the state trunk line fund is appropriated to the department for the following purposes in the following order of priority: (a) For the payment, but only from money restricted as to use by section 9 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, of bonds, notes, or other obligations in the following order of priority: (i) For the payment of contributions pledged before July 18, 1979 and required to be made by the state highway commission or the state transportation commission under contracts entered into before July 18, 1979, under 1941 PA 205, MCL 252.51 to 252.64, for the payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued under 1941 PA 205, MCL 252.51 to 252.64, for the payment of which a sufficient sum is irrevocably appropriated. (ii) For the payment of the principal and interest upon bonds designated "State of Michigan, State Highway Commissioner, Highway Construction Bonds, Series I", dated September 1, 1956, in the aggregate principal amount of $25,000,000.00, issued pursuant to former 1955 PA 87 and the resolution of the state administrative board adopted August 6, 1956, for the payment of which a sufficient sum is irrevocably appropriated. (iii) For the payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued under section 18b for transportation purposes other than comprehensive transportation purposes as defined by law and the payment of contributions pledged to the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued under section 18d and contracts entered into under section 18d by the state highway commission or state transportation commission to be made pursuant to contracts entered into under section 18d. A sufficient portion of the fund is irrevocably appropriated to pay, when due, the principal and interest on bonds or notes issued under section 18b for purposes other than comprehensive transportation purposes as defined by law, and to pay the annual contributions of the state highway commission and the state transportation commission as are pledged for the payment of bonds issued under contracts authorized by section 18d. (b) For the transfer of money appropriated under section 10(1)(i) 10(1)(j) to the transportation economic development fund, but the transfer shall be reduced each fiscal year by the amount of debt service to be paid in that year from the state trunk line fund for bonds, notes, or other obligations issued to fund projects of the transportation economic development fund, which in an amount shall that must be certified by the department. (c) For the transfer of money appropriated under section 10(1)(a) to the rail grade crossing account in the state trunk line fund for expenditure for rail grade crossing improvement purposes at rail grade crossings on public roads and streets under the jurisdiction of this state, counties, cities, or villages. The department shall select projects for funding in accordance with the following: (i) Not more than 50% or less than 30% of this money and matched federal money shall may be expended for state trunk line projects. (ii) In prioritizing projects for this money, in whole or in part, the department shall consider train and vehicular traffic volumes, accident history, traffic control device improvement needs, and the availability of funding. (iii) Consistent with the other requirements for this money, the first priority for money deposited under this subdivision for rail grade crossing improvements and retirement shall be is to match federal money from the railroad-highway grade crossing improvement program or other comparable federal programs if a match is required under federal law. (iv) If the department and a road authority with jurisdiction over the crossing formally agree that the grade crossing should be eliminated by permanent closing of the public road or street, the physical removal of the crossing, roadway within railroad rights of way and street termination treatment shall must be negotiated between the road authority and railroad company. The money provided to the road authority as a result of the crossing closure shall must be credited to its account representing the same road or street system on which the crossing is located and shall must be used for any transportation purpose within that road authority's jurisdiction. (d) For the transfer of money appropriated under section 10(1)(b) to the grade crossing surface account in the state trunk line fund for expenditure for rail grade crossing surface improvement purposes at rail grade crossings on public roads and streets under the jurisdiction of counties, cities, or villages. Projects shall must be selected for funding in accordance with the following: (i) In prioritizing projects, the department shall consider vehicular traffic volumes, relative crossing surface condition, the ability of the railroad and local road authority to make coordinated improvements, and the availability of funding. (ii) The grade crossing surface account shall must fund 60% of the project cost, with the remaining 40% funded by the railroad company. (iii) Funding under the grade crossing surface account shall be is limited to items of work that are normally the responsibility of the railroad under section 309 of the railroad code of 1993, 1993 PA 354, MCL 462.309. Maintenance of the roadway approaches to the crossing will continue to be the responsibility of the party with jurisdiction over that roadway. (e) For the total operating expenses of the state trunk line fund for each fiscal year as appropriated by the legislature. (f) For the preservation of state trunk line highways and bridges. (g) For the opening, widening, improving, construction, and reconstruction of state trunk line highways and bridges, including the acquisition of necessary rights of way and the work incidental to that opening, widening, improving, construction, or reconstruction. Those sums in the state trunk line fund not otherwise appropriated, distributed, determined, or set aside by law shall must be used for the construction or reconstruction of the national system of interstate and defense highways, referred to in this act as "the interstate highway system" to the extent necessary to match federal aid money as the federal aid money becomes available for that purpose; and, for the construction and reconstruction of the state trunk line system. (h) The department may enter into agreements with a local road agency or a private sector company to perform work on a highway, road, or street. The agreements may provide for the performance by any of the contracting parties of any of the work contemplated by the contract including maintenance, engineering services, and the acquisition of rights of way in connection with the work, by purchase or condemnation by any of the contracting parties in its own name, and for joint participation in the costs, but only to the extent that the contracting parties are otherwise authorized by law to expend money on the highways, roads, or streets. The department also may contract with a local road agency to advance money to a local road agency to pay the costs of improving railroad grade crossings on the terms and conditions agreed to in the contract. A contract may be executed before or after the state transportation commission borrows money for the purpose of advancing money to a local road agency, but the contract shall must be executed before the advancement of any money to a local road agency by the state transportation commission, and shall must provide for the full reimbursement of any advancement by a local road agency to the department, with interest, within 15 years after advancement, from any available revenue sources of the local road agency or, if provided in the contract, by deduction from the periodic disbursements of any money returned by the state to the local road agency. (i) For providing inventories of supplies and materials required for the activities of the department. The department may purchase supplies and materials for these purposes, with payment to be made out of the state trunk line fund to be charged on the basis of issues from inventory in accordance with the accounting and purchasing laws of this state. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the department shall annually expend at least 90% of state revenue appropriated annually to the state trunk line fund less the amounts described in subdivisions (a) to (i) for the preservation of highways, roads, streets, and bridges and for the payment of debt service on bonds, notes, or other obligations described in subsection (1)(a) issued after July 1, 1983, for the purpose of providing money for the preservation of highways, roads, streets, and bridges. Of the amounts appropriated for state trunk line projects, the department shall, where possible, secure pavement warranties for full replacement or appropriate repair for contracted construction work on pavement projects whose cost exceeds $2,000,000.00 and projects for new construction or reconstruction undertaken after the effective date of the 2015 amendatory act that amended this subsection. April 1, 2016. The department shall compile and make available to the public an annual report of all warranties that were secured under this subsection and all pavement projects whose costs exceed $2,000,000.00 where a warranty was not secured as provided in subsection (14). If an appropriate certificate is filed under section 18e but only to the extent necessary, this subsection does not prohibit the use of any amount of money restricted as to use by section 9 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 and deposited in the state trunk line fund for the payment of debt service on bonds, notes, or other obligations pledging for the payment thereof money restricted as to use by section 9 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 and deposited in the state trunk line fund, whenever issued, as specified under subsection (1)(a). The amounts that are deducted from the state trunk line fund for the purpose of the calculation required by this subsection are as follows: (a) Amounts expended for the purposes described in subsection (1)(a) for the payment of debt service on bonds, notes, or other obligations issued before July 2, 1983. (b) Amounts expended to provide the state matching requirement for projects on the national highway system and for the payment of debt service on bonds, notes, or other obligations issued after July 1, 1983, for the purpose of providing money for the state matching requirements for projects on the national highway system. (c) Amounts expended for the construction of a highway, street, road, or bridge to 1 or more of the following or for the payment of debt service on bonds, notes, or other obligations issued after July 1, 1983, for the purpose of providing money for the construction of a highway, street, road, or bridge to 1 or more of the following: (i) A location for which a building permit has been obtained for the construction of a manufacturing or industrial facility. (ii) A location for which a building permit has been obtained for the renovation of, or addition to, a manufacturing or industrial facility. (d) Amounts expended for capital outlay other than for highways, roads, streets, and bridges or to pay debt service on bonds, notes, or other obligations issued after July 1, 1983, for the purpose of providing money for capital outlay other than for highways, roads, streets, and bridges. (e) Amounts expended for the operating expenses of the department other than the units of the department performing the functions assigned on January 1, 1983 to the bureau of highways. (f) Amounts expended pursuant to contracts entered into before January 1, 1983. (g) Amounts expended for the purposes described in subsection (5). (h) Amounts appropriated for deposit in the transportation economic development fund and the rail grade crossing account pursuant to under section 10(1)(a) and (h).the transportation economic development fund under section 10(1)(j). (i) Upon the affirmative recommendation of the director of the department and the approval by resolution of the state transportation commission, those amounts expended for projects vital to the economy of this state, a region, or local area or the safety of the public. The resolution shall must state the cost of the project exempted from this subsection. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the department shall expend annually at least 90% of the federal revenue distributed to the credit of the state trunk line fund in that year, except for federal revenue expended for the purposes described in subsection (2)(b), (c), (f), and (i) and for the payment of notes issued under section 18b(9) on the preservation of highways, roads, streets, and bridges. The requirement of this subsection is waived if compliance would cause this state to be ineligible according to federal law for federal revenue, but only to the extent necessary to make this state eligible according to federal law for that revenue. (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department may loan money to a local road agency for paying capital costs of transportation purposes described in the second paragraph of section 9 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued pursuant to under section 18b or from the state trunk line fund. Loans made directly from the state trunk line fund shall must not be made only after provision of until money is provided for the purposes specified in subsection (1)(a) to (f). Loans described in this subsection are not subject to the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821. (5) A local road agency may borrow money from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued under section 18b or the state trunk line fund for the purposes set forth in subsection (4) that shall be are repayable, with interest, from 1 or more of the following: (a) The money to be received by the local road agency from the Michigan transportation fund, except to the extent the money has been or may in the future be pledged by contract in accordance with under 1941 PA 205, MCL 252.51 to 252.64, or has been or may in the future be pledged for the payment of the principal and interest upon notes issued under 1943 PA 143, MCL 141.251 to 141.254, or has been or may in the future be pledged for the payment of principal and interest upon bonds issued under section 18c or 18d, or has been or may in the future be pledged for the payment of the principal and interest upon bonds issued under 1952 PA 175, MCL 247.701 to 247.707. (b) Any other legally available money of the local road agency, other than the general funds of the county. (6) If required by the department, loans made under subsection (4) are payable by deduction by the state treasurer, upon direction of the department, from the periodic disbursements of any money returned by this state under this act to the local road agency, but only after sufficient money has been returned to the local road agency to provide for the payment of contractual obligations incurred or to be incurred and principal and interest on notes and bonds issued or to be issued under 1941 PA 205, MCL 252.51 to 252.64, 1943 PA 143, MCL 141.251 to 141.254, 1952 PA 175, MCL 247.701 to 247.707, or section 18c or 18d. The department shall establish interest rates and payment schedules of any loans made from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued pursuant to under section 18b shall be established by the department to conform as closely as practicable to the interest rate and repayment schedules on the bonds or notes issued to make the loans. However, the department may allow for the deferral of the first payment of interest or principal on the loans for a period of not to exceed 1 year after the respective first payment of interest or principal on the bonds or notes issued to make the loans. (7) The amount borrowed by a local road agency under subsection (5) shall must not be included in, or charged against, any constitutional, statutory, or charter debt limitation of the county, city, or village and shall must not be included in the determination of the maximum annual principal and interest requirements of, or the limitations upon, the maximum annual principal and interest incurred under 1941 PA 205, MCL 252.51 to 252.64, 1943 PA 143, MCL 141.251 to 141.254, 1952 PA 175, MCL 247.701 to 247.707, or section 18c or 18d. (8) The local road agency is not required to seek or obtain the approval of the electors, the municipal finance commission or its successor agency, or, except as provided in this subsection, the department of treasury to borrow money under subsection (5). The borrowing is not subject to the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821, or to section 5(g) 5(1)(g) of the home rule city act, 1909 PA 279, MCL 117.5. The department shall give at least 10 days' notice to the state treasurer of its intention to make a loan under subsection (4). If the state treasurer gives notice to the director of the department within 10 days of after receiving the notice from the department, that, based upon the then existing financial or credit situation of the local road agency, it would not be in the best interests of this state to make a loan under subsection (4) to the local road agency, the loan shall must not be made unless the state treasurer, after a hearing, if requested by the affected local road agency, subsequently gives notice to the director of the department that the loan may be made on the conditions that the state treasurer specifies. (9) The state transportation commission may borrow money and issue bonds and notes under section 18b to make loans to a local road agency for the purposes described in the second paragraph of section 9 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, as provided in subsection (4). A single issue of bonds or notes may be issued for the purposes specified in subsection (4) and for the other purposes specified in section 18b. The department shall notify the house and senate transportation appropriations subcommittees shall be notified by the department if there are extras and overruns sufficient to require approval of either the state administrative board or the commission, or both, on any contract between the department and a local road agency or a private business. (10) The director of the department, after consultation with representatives of the interests of local road agencies, shall establish, by intergovernmental communication, procedures for the implementation and administration of the loan program established under subsections (4) to (9). (11) Not more than 8% per year of all of the money received by and returned to the department from any source for the purposes of this section may be expended for administrative expenses. The department shall be is subject to section 14(5) if more than 8% per year is expended for administrative expenses. As used in this subsection, "administrative expenses" means expenses that are not assigned including, but not limited to, specific road construction or preservation projects and are often referred to as general or supportive services. Administrative expenses do not include net equipment expense, net capital outlay, debt service principal and interest, and payments to other state or local offices that are assigned, but not limited to, specific road construction projects or preservation activities. (12) Any performance audits of the department shall must be conducted according to government auditing standards issued by the United States General Accounting Office. (13) Contracts entered into to advance money to a local road agency under subsection (1)(g) (1)(h) are not subject to the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821. (14) The department shall prepare on an annual basis a report listing all warranties that were secured under subsection (2) and indicate whether any of those warranties were redeemed and all pavement projects whose costs exceed $2,000,000.00 for which a warranty was not secured as described in subsection (2). The department shall make the report required by this subsection available to the public upon request and shall also post the report on its website, which shall must include, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) The type of project. (b) The cost or estimated cost of the project. (c) The expected lifespan of the project. (d) Whether or not the project met or is currently meeting its expected lifespan. (e) If the project failed to meet or is not meeting its expected lifespan, the cause of the failure and the cost to replace or repair the project. (f) The entity responsible for paying the cost of replacing or repairing the project. (15) As used in this section: (a) "Local road agency" means that term as defined in section 9a. (b) "Rail grade crossing improvement purposes" means 1 or more of the following: (i) The installation and modernization of active and passive warning devices at railroad grade crossings. (ii) The installation or improvement of grade crossing surfaces. (iii) Modification, relocation, or modernization of railroad grade crossing active and passive warning devices necessitated by roadway improvement projects. (iv) Test installations of innovative warning devices or other innovative applications. (v) Construction of new grade separations. (vi) A cash incentive payment made pursuant to under subsection (1)(c)(iv) for any public road or street crossing, in an amount no greater than the cost of installing flashing light signals and half roadway gates at the crossing. (vii) Any other work that would be eligible for funding under the federal railroad-highway grade crossing improvement program or other comparable programs. (c) "Transportation economic development fund" means the transportation economic development fund created in section 2 of 1987 PA 231, MCL 247.902. Sec. 11k. (1) The local agency disaster relief board fund is created in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (2) The board shall expend money appropriated to the fund and the interest accruing to the fund as provided in this section. Up to $5,000,000.00 annually may be deposited in the fund and the balance of the fund must not exceed $50,000,000.00 at the beginning of a fiscal year plus funds already obligated but not spent. The money in the fund is not subject to section 12(15). (3) The local agency disaster relief program is created in the department. The program must provide financial assistance as provided in this section and in accordance with the board's policies, criteria, agreements, or contracts to assist in repairing or replacing a local road agency's infrastructure following a local or state-level declared emergency. (4) The local agency disaster relief board is created in the department. The first members of the board must be appointed by not later than the first October 1 after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. The board must, except as otherwise provided in this section, consist of the all of the following individuals: (a) Three voting members appointed by the County Road Association of Michigan. (b) Two voting members appointed by the Michigan Municipal League. (c) One voting member, who must be an engineer, appointed jointly by the County Road Association of Michigan and the Michigan Municipal League. (d) One nonvoting member appointed by the department. (e) One nonvoting member appointed by the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (f) One nonvoting member appointed by the department of state police. (5) Except as provided in subsection (6), members of the board shall serve for terms of 2 years or until a successor is appointed, whichever is later. (6) Of the first members appointed to the board, the following members shall serve a term of 3 years: (a) Two voting members appointed under subsection (4)(a) as determined by the County Road Association of Michigan. (b) One voting member appointed under subsection (4)(b) as determined by the Michigan Municipal League. (c) The nonvoting member appointed under subsection (4)(d). (7) At the expiration of a member's term or if a vacancy occurs on the board, an individual must be appointed to the board or to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term subject to all of the following: (a) A successor to a voting member appointed under subsection (4)(a), (b), or (c) must be appointed jointly by the County Road Association of Michigan and the Michigan Municipal League. (b) A successor to a nonvoting member appointed under subsection (4)(d), (e), or (f) must be appointed by the same department that appointed that nonvoting member. (8) A member of the board may be removed by the governor or the board for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (9) The nonvoting member appointed by the department under subsection (4)(d) shall call the first meeting of the board. At the first meeting, the board shall elect from among the board's voting members a chairperson and other officers that the board considers necessary or appropriate. After the first meeting, the board shall meet at least quarterly. The chairperson may call a special meeting of the board in response to a local or state-level declared emergency that is of a fiscal magnitude established as actionable by the board. (10) A majority of the voting members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of the board. A majority of the voting members present and serving is required for official action of the board. (11) A member of the board shall serve without compensation but may receive reimbursement for necessary travel and expenses consistent with applicable law and the rules and procedures of the civil service commission and department of technology, management, and budget or local road agency policies, subject to available funding. (12) The board shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (13) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the board in the performance of an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (14) The board may employ part-time or full-time managers or engineers and may contract with a person, in accordance with the board's policies, to provide expertise or to perform professional or technical services, administrative assistance, or legal counsel in accordance with the board's policies. The board shall determine the duties of a manager, engineer, or other person employed under this subsection and shall require the manager, engineer, or other person to maintain all necessary insurances. (15) The program must provide funding to local road agencies for 1 or more of the following: (a) Restoring or replacing a public local road, bridge, or other physical transportation infrastructure to the condition existing before the state-level declared emergency event or to the current state and federal standards as recognized in board policy, if the local road agency has exhausted all other federal and state funding sources. (b) Completing engineering and design to meet current standards. (c) Purchasing land or construction easements required to construct the public road, bridge, or physical transportation infrastructure. (d) Conducting inspection and oversight necessary to ensure that performance standards are met. (e) Performing project administration necessary to ensure that financial accountability standards are met. (16) The board may approve the use of money in the fund for other activities, including, but not limited to, items not otherwise eligible for funding from a federal or state disaster program or from federal or state matching funds, needed to restore a public road, a bridge, drainage, or other facilities as permitted by law on a demonstrated need by a local road agency. (17) To obtain funding under subsection (15), a local road agency must file a funding application with the board at any time as determined by the board, on a form approved by the board that contains the information required by the board. (18) The board shall establish policies, criteria, definitions, and timelines for funding a repair or replace work project and a review process for considering funding applications. By not later than 180 days after receiving a funding application, the board shall notify the applicant in writing whether the funding application is approved in part or in entirety, or if the funding application is rejected or remains pending for a specific reason. Before releasing money from the program, the board shall enter into an agreement with the funding recipient. (19) For each year in which the board receives funding applications under subsection (17), the board shall report by October 1 to the standing committees of the senate and house of representatives with primary jurisdiction over transportation issues and to the senate and house of representatives appropriation subcommittees on transportation on the utilization of money from the fund. The report must include, at a minimum, all of the following: (a) The number of funding applications received. (b) The name of each local road agency that submitted a funding application and whether each funding application was approved or denied. (c) The amount of local match for each funding application that was granted. (d) The individual and annual cumulative amount of money awarded under this section, including an identification of the purpose of the money awarded. (20) As used in this section: (a) "Board" means the local agency disaster relief board created in subsection (4). (b) "Fund" means the local agency disaster relief board fund created in subsection (1). (c) "Funding application" means an application under subsection (17) for money from the program. (d) "Local road agency" means that term as defined in section 9a. (e) "Program" means the local agency disaster relief program created in subsection (3).